Hawaii, session 2026, HB1222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $8,007,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the fiftieth representative district, as follows: 1.   Kalaheo high school, Oahu Plans and design for retrofitting of the school's gymnasium and cafeteria as hurricane shelters. Plans                        $3,500,000 Design                       $3,500,000 Total funding                     $7,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 2.   Kailua high school, Oahu Plans for infrastructure improvement of the athletic complex. Plans                            $1,000 Total funding                         $1,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 3.   Kailua high school, Oahu Plans for fixing school bathrooms to be ADA compliant. Plans                            $1,000 Total funding                         $1,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 4.   Kalaheo high school, Oahu Plans for fixing broken or unusable bleachers in the gymnasium. Plans                            $1,000 Total funding                         $1,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 5.   Kalaheo high school, Oahu Plans for building a girls' locker room. Plans                            $1,000 Total funding                         $1,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 6.   Kalaheo high school, Oahu Plans for fixing building F that is sinking. Plans                        $1,000,000 Total funding                     $1,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 7.   Kailua intermediate school, Oahu Plans for fixing plumbing issues in closed bathrooms. Plans                            $1,000 Total funding                         $1,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 8.   Maunawili elementary school, Oahu Plans for fixing leaky walkways from the classrooms and the admin building to the cafeteria. Plans                            $1,000 Total funding                         $1,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 9.   Maunawili elementary school, Oahu Plans for fixing a leaking library roof. Plans                            $1,000 Total funding                         $1,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. SECTION 2.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________